North Carolina, session 2025, SB885.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts to be used to support the work of the clerks of superior court in assisting
executors and administrators with the process of handling estates and estates-related documents
and filings. The funds appropriated in this section may be used for, but not limited to, the hiring
of additional staff to address lengthy wait times for appointments and the distribution of the
"Decedent Estate Procedures" document currently published by the Administrative Office of the
Courts.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S885-v-1*